incubator/apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="udøg/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eret</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="w__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>w</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tvil__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="still__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sa</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="X__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>X</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stilmøb/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elet</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lane</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ong__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>engene</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enger</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onga</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ongi</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ong</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="syning__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="trom__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>met</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stort/å__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åa</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærne</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ær</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>åi</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="X"><i>X</i><par n="X__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tjuepakning"><i>tjuepakning</i><par n="syning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vernebuingslager"><i>vernebuingslag</i><par n="udøg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svinnprosent"><i>svinnprosent</i><par n="tvil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trefning"><i>trefning</i><par n="syning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vakuumpakning"><i>vakuumpakning</i><par n="syning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vårjamdøger"><i>vårjamdøg</i><par n="udøg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vêrlam"><i>vêrlam</i><par n="trom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stormstøyt"><i>stormstøyt</i><par n="tvil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="telefonprogram"><i>telefonprogram</i><par n="trom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stong"><i>st</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vaniljestong"><i>vaniljest</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="utstellingsrom"><i>utstellingsrom</i><par n="trom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vikjetong"><i>vikjet</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sumarlæger"><i>sumarlæg</i><par n="udøg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="viktong"><i>vikt</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="velling"><i>velling</i><par n="syning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tørrstoffprosent"><i>tørrstoffprosent</i><par n="tvil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tilstandsdiagram"><i>tilstandsdiagram</i><par n="trom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vardøger"><i>vardøg</i><par n="udøg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stilmøbel"><i>stilmøb</i><par n="stilmøb/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svingstong"><i>svingst</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tong"><i>t</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strykeprosent"><i>strykeprosent</i><par n="tvil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spesidalar"><i>spesidalar</i><par n="tvil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="viking"><i>viking</i><par n="syning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tilfluktsrom"><i>tilfluktsrom</i><par n="trom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="still"><i>still</i><par n="still__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tømmerdoning"><i>tømmerdoning</i><par n="syning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="styrestong"><i>styrest</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trekkprosent"><i>trekkprosent</i><par n="tvil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tomrom"><i>tomrom</i><par n="trom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tverrstong"><i>tverrst</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spong"><i>sp</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="støyt"><i>støyt</i><par n="tvil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="teleskopstong"><i>teleskopst</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tilstøyt"><i>tilstøyt</i><par n="tvil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sommarlæger"><i>sommarlæg</i><par n="udøg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spektrogram"><i>spektrogram</i><par n="trom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stålrøyrsmøbel"><i>stålrøyrsmøb</i><par n="stilmøb/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tvangsarbeidslæger"><i>tvangsarbeidslæg</i><par n="udøg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uviting"><i>uviting</i><par n="syning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udøger"><i>udøg</i><par n="udøg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="utrom"><i>utrom</i><par n="trom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trekløver"><i>trekløver</i><par n="tvil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strømming"><i>strømming</i><par n="syning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tommeltå"><i>tommelt</i><par n="stort/å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stålrørsmøbel"><i>stålrørsmøb</i><par n="stilmøb/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vassvelling"><i>vassvelling</i><par n="syning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="telefontelegram"><i>telefontelegram</i><par n="trom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vikketong"><i>vikket</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stutting"><i>stutting</i><par n="syning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spireprosent"><i>spireprosent</i><par n="tvil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="strykprosent"><i>strykprosent</i><par n="tvil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stenogram"><i>stenogram</i><par n="trom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soldøger"><i>soldøg</i><par n="udøg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vippestong"><i>vippest</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tanks"><i>tanks</i><par n="tvil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stolpediagram"><i>stolpediagram</i><par n="trom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="w"><i>w</i><par n="w__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vesletå"><i>veslet</i><par n="stort/å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stortå"><i>stort</i><par n="stort/å__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vassløysning"><i>vassløysning</i><par n="syning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stytting"><i>stytting</i><par n="syning__n"/></e>
    <e lm="soverom"><i>soverom</i><par n="trom__n"/></e>
    <e lm="varelager"><i>varelag</i><par n="udøg/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tåstøyt"><i>tåstøyt</i><par n="tvil__n"/></e>
    <e lm="staurstong"><i>staurst</i><par n="t/ong__n"/></e>
